Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2309
State funds; State Treasurer; duty to secure best terms possible.

It is made the duty of the State Treasurer to use all reasonable and proper means to secure to the state the best terms for the depositing of the money belonging to the state, consistent with the safekeeping and prompt payment of the funds of the state when demanded.

Laws 1891, c. 50, § 4, p. 350;

R.S.1913, § 6658;

C.S.1922, § 6189;

C.S.1929, § 77-2504;

R.S.1943, § 77-2309.